District of Columbia statutes.
7-1704

“No Smoking” signs.

(a)

In any place, elevator, or vehicle in which smoking is prohibited, the owner, manager, or person in charge of the place, elevator, or vehicle shall post or cause to be posted signs that read, “No Smoking Under Penalty of Law”, “No Smoking Except in Smoking Areas”, or “Smoking in Accordance With Employer’s Smoking Policy Only”. In any place, elevator, or vehicle where smoking is restricted, the sign shall include the following warning: “Smoking causes lung cancer, heart disease, emphysema, and may cause fetal injury, premature birth, and low birth weight in pregnant women.” Signs posted shall clearly state the maximum fine for a violation of this subchapter. Signs shall be visible to the public at the entrance to the area and on the interior of the area in sufficient number in a manner that gives notice to the public of the applicable law.

(a-1)

In a public recreational facility, the Director of the Department of Parks and Recreation shall post or cause to be posted signs that read “No Smoking. Need to quit? Contact the D.C. Quitline at 1-800-Quit-Now (784-8669).”

(a-2)

In a private playground, the owner, manager, or individual or entity responsible for maintaining the private playground shall post or cause to be posted signs that read “No Smoking. Need to quit? Contact the D.C. Quitline at 1-800-Quit-Now (784-8669).”

(b)

Where smoking is prohibited pursuant to this subchapter all signs posted shall include the internationally recognized no smoking symbol. Where smoking is restricted pursuant to this subchapter all signs posted shall include the internationally recognized smoking symbol.

(c)

It shall be unlawful for any person to obscure, remove, deface, mutilate, or destroy any sign posted in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-22, § 5, 26 DCR 390
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-100, § 2(e), 35 DCR 1182
May 2, 1991, D.C. Law 8-262, § 2(c), 37 DCR 8434
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-223, § 2, 40 DCR 590
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-48, § 2(c), 60 DCR 15145
This section is referenced in § 7-742 and § 7-1706.
1981 Ed., § 6-914.
1973 Ed., § 6-824.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-48 added (a-1) and (a-2).
Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 20-48 added (a-1) and (a-2).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-48, § 4, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-48, § 4, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-48, § 4, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-48: Section 4 of D.C. Law 20-48 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-48: Section 4 of D.C. Law 20-48 was repealed by § 7007 of emergency D.C. Act 20-377, effective July 14, 2014, and by § 7007 of emergency D.C. Act 20-449, effective Oct. 10, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-48: Section 4 of D.C. Law 20-48 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 20-48 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7007.

Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 3-22, the District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979, see Mayor’s Order 90-192, December 13, 1990.